Louisiana, session 2026, HB701.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:35 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§35. Membership of the Senate
The Senate of the Legislature of Louisiana shall be composed of thirty-nine
members. The state shall be divided into the following senatorial districts and one
senator shall be chosen from each of the districts:
(1) District 1 is composed of Precincts 9-45 and 9-45A of Orleans Parish;
Precincts 33, 41, 43, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, and 55 of St. Bernard Parish; and Precincts
602, 603, 604, 606, 609, 801, 802, 802A, 803, 804, 805, 806, 807, 808, 809, 810,
811, 812, 813, 814, 815, 815A, 816, 817, 818, 901, 902, 903, 903A, 904, 905, 906,
907, 908, 909, 909A, 910, 911, 913, 914, 915, 916, 917, 918, 921, 922, P01, S01,
S02, S03, S04, S05, S06, S07, S08, S09, S10, S11, S13, S15, S16, S17, S18, S19,
S21, S22, S23, and S24 of St. Tammany Parish.
(2) District 2 is composed of Precincts 28, 30, 36, 37, 38, 39, 44, 45, 47, 48,
50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, and 57 of Ascension Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 2-5,
4-1, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, and 7-1 of Assumption Parish; Precincts 1, 3,
Page 1 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
4, 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, 10B, 11, and 12 of Iberville Parish; Precincts 1-2, 1-4, 1-6, 2-1,
2-1A, 2-3, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-16, 5-1, 5-1A, and 5-3 of Lafourche
Parish; St. James Parish; and St. John the Baptist Parish.
(3) District 3 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 2-1, 2-2, 3-1, 4-2, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3,
6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 7-1, 7-4, 7-23, 7-24, 7-25, 7-25A, 7-26, 7-28A, 7-29, 7-33, 8-1, 8-2,
8-4, 8-6, 8-7, 8-13, 8-14, 8-15, 8-19, 8-20, 8-21, 8-22, 8-23, 8-24, 8-25, 8-26, 9-1,
9-3, 9-4, 9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-8, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 9-12, 9-13, 9-14, 9-15, 9-16, 9-17, 9-19,
9-28, 9-28C, 9-29, 9-30, 9-30A, 9-31, 9-31A, 9-31B, 9-32, 9-39, 9-39B, 9-40, 9-40A,
9-40C, 9-41, 9-41A, 9-41B, 9-41C, 9-41D, 9-44I, 9-44M, and 9-44P of Orleans
Parish and Precincts 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 30, 31, 32, 34, 40,
42, 42A, 44, 45, and 46 of St. Bernard Parish.
(4) District 4 is composed of Precincts 3-9, 3-12, 3-14, 3-15, 3-19, 3-20, 4-6,
4-7, 4-8, 4-9, 4-11, 4-14, 4-15, 4-17, 4-17A, 4-18, 4-20, 4-21, 4-22, 4-23, 5-8, 5-9,
5-10, 5-11, 5-12, 5-13, 5-15, 5-16, 5-17, 5-18, 6-8, 6-9, 7-17, 7-18, 7-19, 7-27,
7-27B, 7-28, 7-30, 7-32, 7-35, 7-37, 7-37A, 7-40, 7-41, 7-42, 8-27, 8-28, 8-30,
9-31D, 9-33, 9-34A, 9-35, 9-35A, 9-36, 9-36B, 9-37, 9-38, 9-38A, 9-42, 9-42C,
9-43A, 9-43B, 9-43C, 9-43E, 9-43F, 9-43G, 9-43H, 9-43I, 9-43J, 9-43K, 9-43L,
9-43M, 9-43N, 9-44, 9-44A, 9-44B, 9-44D, 9-44E, 9-44F, 9-44G, 9-44J, 9-44L,
9-44N, 9-44O, 9-44Q, 17-17, 17-18, 17-18A, 17-19, and 17-20 of Orleans Parish.
(5) District 5 is composed of Precincts 131 and 133 of Jefferson Parish and
Precincts 1-2, 1-5, 1-6, 2-4, 2-6, 2-7, 3-8, 3-18, 4-3, 5-5, 5-7, 6-6, 6-7, 7-2, 7-5, 7-6,
7-7, 7-8, 7-9A, 7-10, 7-11, 7-12, 7-13, 7-14, 7-15, 7-16, 7-20, 7-21, 8-8, 8-9, 8-12,
9-21, 9-23, 9-25, 9-26, 10-3, 10-6, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14,
11-2, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 11-8, 11-9, 11-10, 11-11, 11-12, 11-13, 11-14, 11-17, 12-1,
12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-7, 12-9, 12-10, 12-11, 12-12, 12-13, 12-14, 12-16,
12-17, 12-19, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 13-6, 13-7, 13-8, 13-9, 13-10, 13-11,
13-12, 13-13, 13-14, 13-15, 13-16, 14-17, 14-20, 14-21, 14-23, 14-24A, 14-25,
14-26, 16-5, 16-6, 16-7, 16-8, 16-9, 17-2, 17-3, 17-4, 17-5, 17-6, 17-7, 17-8, 17-9,
17-10, 17-11, 17-12, 17-13, 17-13A, 17-14, 17-15, and 17-16 of Orleans Parish.
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
(6) District 6 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-1A, 1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2,
5-1, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-3A, 6-5, 6-5A, 7-1, 7-1A, 7-3, 7-5, 8-1, 9-1, 9-2, 9-3, and 9-4 of
Catahoula Parish; Precincts 1-3A, 2-1, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 4-1, 4-2, 5-4, 5-5, and 5-6
of Concordia Parish; Precincts 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-21, 2-26, 2-28, 2-33, and 3-6 of East
Baton Rouge Parish; East Feliciana Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 1B, 1C, 1D, 2, 3, 3B, 6,
6A, 6B, 8A, and 9 of Livingston Parish; St. Helena Parish; Precincts 28, 33, 109,
111A, 117, 121, and 121A of Tangipahoa Parish; and West Feliciana Parish.
(7) District 7 is composed of Precincts 211, 213B, 213C, 214A, 214B, 215,
216B, 217, 225, 226, 227, 228, 231, 232A, 232B, 238A, 238B, 1-G, 2-G, 3-G, 4-G,
5-G, 6-G, 7-G, 8-G, and 11-G of Jefferson Parish; Precincts 15-1, 15-2, 15-3, 15-5,
15-6, 15-8, 15-9, 15-10, 15-11, 15-12, 15-12A, 15-13, 15-13A, 15-13B, 15-14,
15-14A, 15-14B, 15-14C, 15-14D, 15-14E, 15-14F, 15-14G, 15-15, 15-15A, 15-15B,
15-16, 15-17, 15-17A, 15-17B, 15-18, 15-18A, 15-18B, 15-18C, 15-18D, 15-18E,
15-18F, 15-19, 15-19A, 15-19B, and 15-19C of Orleans Parish; and Precincts 1-1,
1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 7-1, 7-2, 8-2, 9-1, and 9-2 of Plaquemines Parish.
(8) District 8 is composed of Precincts 189, 190, 192, 193A, 193B, 194A,
194B, 198, 199, 202, 203, 204, 229, 230, 234, 235, 236, 237, 246, 247, 248, 9-G,
10-G, 12-G, 13-G, and 1-L of Jefferson Parish; Precincts 3-1, 3-2, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4,
6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, 8-1, 10-1, 10-2, 11-3, and 11-4 of Lafourche Parish; Precincts
3-1, 4-1, 5-1, 5-1A, 6-1, 6-1A, 6-2, and 8-1 of Plaquemines Parish; and Precincts 1-1,
1-2, 1-3, 1-6, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-6, 7-1,
7-2, and 7-3 of St. Charles Parish.
(9) District 9 is composed of Precincts 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 22, 23, 24,
25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 70,
71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93,
94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 106, 127, 128, 129, 130, 132, 134, 136,
and 138 of Jefferson Parish and Precincts 14-1, 14-2, 14-3, 14-4, 14-5, 14-6, 14-7,
14-8, 14-9, 14-10, 14-11, 14-12, 14-13A, 14-14, 14-15, 14-16, 14-18A, 14-19, 16-1,
16-1A, 16-2, 16-3, 16-4, and 17-1 of Orleans Parish.
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
(10) District 10 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
21, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 69, 105, 117, 118,
119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125A, 125B, 126, 1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 6-H, 7-H, 8-H,
9-H, 1-K, 2-K, 3-K, 4-K, 5-K, 6-KA, 6-KB, 7-KA, 7-KB, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K, 11-K,
12-K, 15-K, 16-K, 17-K, 19-K, 20-K, 25-K, 27-K, 28-K, 29-K, 34-K, and 35-K of
Jefferson Parish.
(11) District 11 is composed of Precincts 103, 104, 105, 106, 106A, 107,
108, 110, 111, 112, 113, 114, 115, 116, 118, 301, 304, 305, 306, 307, 308, 309, 310,
312, 312A, 313, 314, 403, 404, 405, 406, 407, 408, 409, 410, 411, 412, 413, 414,
415, 416, 417, 418, 419, 420, 422, 426, 427, 429, 430, 605, 701, 702, 703, 704, 705,
706, C01, C02, C03, C04, C06, C07, C08, C09, C11, M02, M04, M07, M09, M09A,
and M10 of St. Tammany Parish.
(12) District 12 is composed of Precincts 101, 201, 202, 203, 204, 205, 206,
207, 302, 303, 501, 502, 503, 504, 505, A01, A02, A02A, A03, A04, and F01 of St.
Tammany Parish; Precincts 2, 6, 11, 15, 16, 17, 101, 102, 104, 106, 106A, 107, 108,
110, 112, 114, 115B, 116, 118, 118A, 119, 120, 120A, and 123 of Tangipahoa
Parish; and Washington Parish.
(13) District 13 is composed of Precincts 3-3, 3-10, 3-15, 3-16, 3-22, 3-33,
3-34, 3-38, 3-43, 3-45, 3-47, 3-53, 3-66, 3-71, and 3-73 of East Baton Rouge Parish
and Precincts 2A, 3A, 4, 4A, 4B, 5, 5A, 5B, 5D, 7, 7A, 7B, 7C, 7D, 8B, 19, 19A, 20,
21, 21A, 21B, 23, 23A, 23B, 23C, 24, 24B, 24C, 24D, 25, 26, 26A, 26B, 26C, 27,
28, 29, 35, 35A, 36, 36A, 39, 39A, 39B, 40, 40A, and 41 of Livingston Parish.
(14) District 14 is composed of Precincts 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-10,
1-13, 1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-18 (Part) Tract 000500 - Blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003,
2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016,
2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029,
2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042,
2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055,
2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068,
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
2069, 2070, and 2071; 1-19, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27, 1-28, 1-29,
1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-36, 1-37, 1-38, 1-39, 1-45, 1-46, 1-50, 1-51, 1-57, 1-58, 1-59,
1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-64, 1-65, 1-67, 1-73, 1-76, 1-102, 1-104, 1-107, 3-5, 3-20, 3-23,
3-44, 3-50, 3-55, 3-56, 3-57, 3-63, 3-65, 3-69, 3-70, 3-75, and 3-76 of East Baton
Rouge Parish.
(15) District 15 is composed of Precincts 1-9, 1-11, 1-20, 1-54, 1-55, 1-60,
1-70, 1-71, 1-77, 1-78, 1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-84, 1-87, 1-88, 1-93, 1-96, 1-97, 1-98, 2-1,
2-3, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-16, 2-23, 2-25, 2-27, 2-30, 3-1, 3-2, 3-8, 3-9, 3-12, 3-14,
3-21, 3-24, 3-25, 3-26, 3-28, 3-30, 3-32, 3-37, 3-42, 3-46, 3-54, 3-58, 3-61, and 3-72
of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(16) District 16 is composed of Precincts 1-8, 1-12, 1-33, 1-34, 1-35, 1-40,
1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-44, 1-47, 1-48, 1-49, 1-52, 1-53, 1-56, 1-66, 1-69, 1-72, 1-74,
1-75, 1-79, 1-80, 1-89, 1-90, 1-99, 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 3-4, 3-7, 3-11, 3-13, 3-17,
3-18, 3-19, 3-27, 3-29, 3-31, 3-35, 3-36, 3-39, 3-40, 3-41, 3-48, 3-49, 3-51, 3-52,
3-59, 3-60, 3-62, 3-64, 3-67, 3-68, and 3-74 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(17) District 17 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-18 (Part) Tract 003000 -
Blocks 1043, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069,
1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, and 1083;
Tract 005100 - Blocks 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058,
2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071,
2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084,
2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, and 2097;
1-85, 1-86, 1-91, 1-92, 1-94, 1-95, 1-100, 1-101, 2-2, 2-4, 2-5, 2-9, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15,
2-17, 2-18, 2-19, 2-20, 2-22, 2-24, 2-29, 2-31, 2-32, 2-34, 2-35, 2-36, 2-37, and 2-38
of East Baton Rouge Parish; Precincts 13, 14, 14A, 15, 15A, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21,
22, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 31, and 32 of Iberville Parish; Pointe Coupee Parish; and
West Baton Rouge Parish.
(18) District 18 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12,
13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 40, 41, 42,
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
43, 58, 61, 62, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 69, 71, 72, 73, 76, 77, and 78 of Ascension Parish
and Precincts 16, 17, 18, 18A, 22, 33, 34, and 43 of Livingston Parish.
(19) District 19 is composed of Precincts 104, 108, 115, 116, 150A, 150B,
151, 152, 153, 154, 155, 156, 157A, 170, 171, 172, 173, 174, 175, 176, 177, 178,
179A, 179B, 180, 181, 182, 183, 184, 185A, 185B, 187, 188, 191, 195, 196, 197A,
197B, 200, 201, 205, 210, 212, 213A, 216A, 13-KA, 13-KB, 14-K, 21-K, 22-K,
23-K, 24-K, 26-K, 30-K, 31-K, 33-K, 1-W, 3-W, 4-W, 5-W, 6-W, and 7-W of
Jefferson Parish and Precincts 1-4, 1-5, 2-1, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6, 5-1, 5-3, 5-4, 7-4, and
7-5 of St. Charles Parish.
(20) District 20 is composed of Precincts 1-GI of Jefferson Parish; Precincts
3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 9-1, 9-2, 10-3, 10-4, 10-6, 10-8,
10-9, 10-10, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 10-15, 10-16, 11-1, 11-2, and 11-5 of
Lafourche Parish; and Precincts 14, 15, 16, 18, 19, 20, 23, 25, 27, 29, 31, 34, 35, 38,
41, 42, 43, 45, 48, 49, 52, 53, 55, 56, 57, 59, 60, 62, 63, 68, 69, 71, 72, 73, 81, 83, 84,
85, 88, 90, 94, 95, 100, and 110 of Terrebonne Parish.
(21) District 21 is composed of Precincts 2-3, 2-4, 3-1, 3-2, 4-4, 5-3, 7-2,
7-3, 8-1, and 9-1 of Assumption Parish; Precincts 8-3, 9-1, 9-4, 10-1, 10-4, 11-1,
11-3, 11-6, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, and 12-4 of Iberia Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-5, 2-2,
2-8, 2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, and 5-2 of Lafourche Parish; Precincts 1 and 2 of St.
Martin Parish; St. Mary Parish; and Precincts 1, 2, 5, 7, 8, 10, 11, 12, 17, 28, 33, 37,
39, 51, 64, 67, 76, and 87 of Terrebonne Parish.
(22) District 22 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-7, 1-8, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3,
3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4,
7-5, 8-1, 8-2, 9-2, 9-5, 10-2, 10-3, 11-4, 11-5, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 14-1,
14-3, 14-4, and 14-5 of Iberia Parish; Precincts 99, 100, 101, 102, 110, 111, 134, and
135 of Lafayette Parish; and Precincts 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16,
17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39,
40, 41, 42, and 43 of St. Martin Parish.
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
(23) District 23 is composed of Precincts 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33,
35, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 67, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76,
77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 104,
108, 109, 114, 115, 117, 119, 120, 121, 124, 125, 126, 127, 128, and 130 of
Lafayette Parish.
(24) District 24 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12,
13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60,
63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 112, 113, 122, and 123 of Lafayette Parish and Precincts 6, 8, 9,
9A, 10, 10A, 11, 11B, 12, 18, 18A, 18B, 19, 19A, 20, 20B, 21, 21A, 22, 22B, 23,
23A, 24, 24B, 25, 26, 26A, 27, 28, 32, 32A, 33, 33A, 34, 34A, 35, 36, 37, 37A, 41,
41A, 42, and 43 of St. Landry Parish.
(25) District 25 is composed of Precincts 2-5, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3,
5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-10, and 6-15 of Acadia Parish; Precincts 260, 261, 262, 325, 326,
327, 331, 333, 334, 335, 336, 337, 338, 339, 340, 362, 363, 365, 366, 367, 368, 369,
370, 371S, 372, 465, 466E, 466W, 468, 469, 700, 701, 702, 703, 760, 761, 762, 800,
801, 861E, and 861W of Calcasieu Parish; Cameron Parish; and Jefferson Davis
Parish.
(26) District 26 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7,
1-8, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-7, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-6, 6-7, 6-8,
6-12, 6-13, 6-14, and 6-16 of Acadia Parish; Precincts 34, 36, 86, 103, 105, 106, 107,
116, 118, 133, and 136 of Lafayette Parish; and Vermilion Parish.
(27) District 27 is composed of Precincts 160E, 161, 162E, 162W, 163, 164,
165, 166E, 166W, 167, 300, 301, 302, 303, 304, 305, 306, 307, 308, 309E, 309W,
310, 311, 312, 313E, 313W, 314, 315E, 315W, 316E, 316W, 317, 318, 319N, 319S,
320E, 320W, 321, 322, 323, 324, 328, 329, 330, 332N, 332S, 360, 361, 364, 371N,
400, 401, 402, 403, 404, 405, 406, 407, 408, 440, 441, 461, 463, 464, 467, 860N, and
860S of Calcasieu Parish.
(28) District 28 is composed of Precincts 4-1, 4-2, 4-6, 7-2, 7-3, and 7-4 of
Acadia Parish; Evangeline Parish; Precincts 3-9, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 4-7, and
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
4-9 of Natchitoches Parish; Precincts C23, C30, C31, C33, C34, C35, C36, C37-A,
C37-B, C41, C42, S1, S2, S5, S7, S8, S9, S10, S11, S13, S22, S23, S24, S25, S26,
S27, S28, and S29 of Rapides Parish; and Precincts 1, 1A, 1B, 1C, 1D, 2, 2A, 2B,
2C, 3, 4, 4A, 4B, 5, 7, 7A, 13, 13A, 14, 14A, 14B, 15, 16, 16A, 17, 29, 29A, 30, 30A,
30B, 31, 38, 39, 39A, 40, 44, 44A, 44B, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 50, 50A, 51, 51A, and 52
of St. Landry Parish.
(29) District 29 is composed of Precincts 10-2 and 10-4 of Avoyelles Parish;
Precincts 1-2, 1-3, 1-6, 2-3, and 7-4 of Bienville Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4,
2-1, 2-2, 3-1, 3-2, and 3-3 of Grant Parish; Precincts 16, 17, 17A, 18, 19A, 19AI, 20,
20A, 25, 25A, and 25B of Jackson Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 3-1, 3-3, 6-4,
6-5, 6-6, 8-3, 9-1, 9-2, 9-3, 9-4, 10-1, 10-2, 10-4, 10-5, 10-6, 11-1, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5,
12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, and 12-6 of Lincoln Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-3A, 1-4,
1-5, 1-5A, 1-8, 1-13, 1-14, 2-7, and 2-8 of Natchitoches Parish; Precincts C1, C2, C3,
C4, C5, C6, C7, C8, C9, C10, C11-A, C11-B, C13, C14, C15, C17, C18, C19, C20,
C21, C22, C24, C25, C26, C27, C28, C32, C38-A, C38-B, C39, C40, N1, N2, N3,
N4, N5, N6, N8, N9, N11, N21, S4, S6A, S6B, S14, S17, S18, S19, S20, and S21 of
Rapides Parish; and Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-5, 2-1, 2-3, 3-1A, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 6-1, 6-1A,
7-1, 7-1A, and 7-2A of Winn Parish.
(30) District 30 is composed of Allen Parish; Beauregard Parish; Precincts
160W, 460E, 460W, 560, 561, 562, 600, 601, 602, 603, 660, 661, 662, 663, and 664
of Calcasieu Parish; and Vernon Parish.
(31) District 31 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-4, 1-5, 1-7, 2-1, 2-2, 3-1,
3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5,
7-1, 7-2, and 7-3 of Bienville Parish; Precincts 1-2, 1-3, 1-3A, 1-3B, 1-4, 1-5, 4-8A,
4-8B, 4-8E, 4-8G, and 4-10 of Bossier Parish; Precincts 8-6, 8-8, 8-9, 9-1, 9-2, 9-3,
9-8, 9-12, and 9-13 of Caddo Parish; Precincts 1, 4, 5, 9, 26, 38, 42, 51, 53, 56, and
59 of De Soto Parish; Precincts 1-1A, 1-4A, 1-6, 1-7, 1-9, 1-9A, 1-10, 1-10A, 1-10B,
1-11, 1-12, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7A, 2-9, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7,
3-8, 3-10, and 4-8 of Natchitoches Parish; Red River Parish; Sabine Parish; Precincts
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
32, 34, 35, 36, 38, 39, 40, 41, and 42 of Webster Parish; and Precincts 3-1B, 3-2, 3-3,
4-1, 4-2, 4-3, and 4-5 of Winn Parish.
(32) District 32 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 2-2, 2-2A, 2-2C,
2-4, 2-4A, 2-5, 2-7, 2-8, 3-1, 3-1A, 3-3, 4-1, 4-2, 4-2A, 5-1A, 6-1, 6-2, 6-2A, 7-1,
7-2, 7-3, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-3A, 9-1, 9-2, 9-2A, 9-3, 9-5, 10-2A, 10-3A, 10-3B, 11-1,
and 11-2 of Avoyelles Parish; Caldwell Parish; Precincts 1-4, 3-1, 3-2, ,4-1 and 4-2
of Catahoula Parish; Franklin Parish; La Salle Parish; Precincts 57 and 58 of
Ouachita Parish; Precincts N10, N12, N13-A, N13-B, N14-B, N22, N23, N24, N25,
N26, N27, N28, N29, S15, and S16 of Rapides Parish; and Precincts 3 and 4 of
Richland Parish.
(33) District 33 is composed of Claiborne Parish; Precincts 3-2, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6,
4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-2, and 6-2 of Lincoln Parish; Precincts 23, 26-1, 27, 29, 32,
35, 39-1, 40, 42, 45, 47, 48, and 51 of Morehouse Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 4, 6, 7,
8, 9, 35, 36, 37, 41, 43, 44, 44A, 49, 50, 51, 51A, 53, and 76 of Ouachita Parish;
Union Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 3, 5, 6, 9, 9A, 10, and 14 of Webster Parish; and
West Carroll Parish.
(34) District 34 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-4, 4-3, 4-4, and 5-1 of
Concordia Parish; East Carroll Parish; Madison Parish; Precincts 1, 3-1, 6, 7, 8, 12,
13, 14, 16, 20, 21, 24, 31, 37, 39-2, 53, and 54 of Morehouse Parish; Precincts 3, 5,
9A, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 65, 65A, 66, 67,
68, 69, 70, 72, 73, 74, and 79 of Ouachita Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 8, 10, 11, 12, 12B,
13, 17, 18, 23, 25, 26, 27, 28, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, and 35 of Richland Parish; and
Tensas Parish.
(35) District 35 is composed of Precincts 2-3, 2-5, 2-6, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1,
5-2, 5-3, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-5, 7-6, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, and 8-4 of Grant
Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 5A, 6, 6A, 7, 8, 8A, 9, 10, 10A, 11, 11A, 13, 13A, 15,
and 22 of Jackson Parish; Precincts 4-6, 5-1, 5-3, 5-4, 6-1, 6-3, 7-1, 7-2, 8-1, 8-2, and
10-3 of Lincoln Parish; Precincts 27, 28, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 38, 39, 40, 42, 45, 46, 47,
48, 52, 52A, 54, 55, 56, 56A, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 71, 75, 77, and 78 of Ouachita
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
Parish; Precincts N7, N14-A, N15, N16, N17, N18-A, N18-B, N19, and N20 of
Rapides Parish; and Precincts 5-5, 6-3, 6-6, 7-2, and 7-7 of Winn Parish.
(36) District 36 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-3, 2-3A, 2-4,
2-5A, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-15, 2-16, 2-17A, 2-17B, 2-18B, 2-18C, 2-18D,
2-18F, 2-18G, 2-18H, 2-18I, 2-19, 2-21A, 2-21B, 2-21C, 2-21D, 2-21E, 2-22A,
2-22B, 2-22C, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 4-1A, 4-2, 4-2A, 4-3A, 4-3B, 4-3D, 4-4A, 4-4B,
4-5A, 4-6A, 4-6B, 4-7A, 4-7B, 4-8C, 4-9, 4-11A, 4-11B, and 4-11C of Bossier
Parish and Precincts 8, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 17A, 18, 18A, 22, 22A, 25, 25A, 26,
27, 28, 29, 31, 33, and 43 of Webster Parish.
(37) District 37 is composed of Precincts 10, 11, 11A, 12, 13A, 13B, 14, 15,
30, 31, 32, and 38 of Livingston Parish; Precincts 102, 401, 402, 421, M01, M06,
M08, M11, M12, and MD1 of St. Tammany Parish; and Precincts 40A, 41, 42, 43,
44, 45A, 45B, 46, 47, 49, 70, 70A, 71, 72, 72A, 73, 74, 120B, 122A, 122B, 122C,
124, 125, 127, 129A, 133, 133A, 137, 137A, 137B, 137C, 137D, 139, 141, 141A,
143, 143A, 145, 147, 149, 149A, and 151 of Tangipahoa Parish.
(38) District 38 is composed of Precincts 1-10, 1-14, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8,
4-9, 4-10, 5-10, 6-1, 6-6, 6-7, 6-8, 6-9, 6-10, 7-10, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-4, 8-5, 8-7, 9-4,
9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 10-2, 10-5, 10-6, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 11-1, 11-2, 11-3,
11-4, 11-5, 11-6, 11-7, 11-8, 11-9, 11-10, 12-1, 12-3, 12-6, 12-7, 12-8, 12-9, 12-10,
and 12-11 of Caddo Parish and Precincts 10, 11, 16, 22, 23, 28, 30, 30A, 31, 32, 33,
34, 35, 46, and 46B of De Soto Parish.
(39) District 39 is composed of Precincts 2-12A, 2-12B, 2-13, 2-14, 2-20,
2-23, and 4-8D of Bossier Parish and Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-8,
1-9, 1-11, 1-12, 1-13, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 3-1,
3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-8, 3-9, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 5-6, 5-7,
5-8, 5-9, 5-11, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, 7-5, 7-6, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9, 10-1, 10-3,
10-4, 12-2, 12-4, and 12-5 of Caddo Parish.
Section 2. R.S. 24:35.1 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
Section 3. The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file named
"2026 Precinct Shapefiles (01-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature of
Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based upon
those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana House of Representatives and the Louisiana
Senate to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the Legislature
of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 18:532 and
532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall not reduce the term of office of any
person holding any position or office on the effective date of this Section for which the
appointment or election is based upon a Senate district as composed pursuant to R.S.
24:35.1. Any position or office that is filled by appointment or election based upon a Senate
district and that is to be filled after January 10, 2028, shall be appointed or elected based
upon the district as it is described in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 5.(A) Solely for the purposes of qualifying for election and the conduct of
the election of members to the Louisiana Senate at the regularly scheduled election for
members of the Louisiana Senate in 2027, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall
become effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the
governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the
Page 11 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1038 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 701
governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act
is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of
Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval for the
purposes established in this Subsection.
(B) For subsequent elections of members to the Louisiana Senate and for all other
purposes, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective at 10:00 a.m. on
January 10, 2028.
(C) The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective at 10:00 a.m. on
January 10, 2028.
(D) The provisions of this Section and Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section and
Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.